Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-155
Materiel administrator; inventory record; state property; powers and duties.

The materiel administrator shall have complete control of all furniture and equipment in the capitol, state laboratory, Governor's Mansion, and all other buildings owned or leased by the State of Nebraska, except telephone and telecommunications equipment and equipment and furniture of the Legislature and the Supreme Court. The materiel administrator shall keep in his or her office a complete record containing an itemized account of all state property, including furniture and equipment under his or her care and control. Such inventory record shall be maintained as a management system to assure efficient utilization of state property with particular emphasis on identification of surpluses. Such system shall be designed so as to provide the materiel administrator with the knowledge of potential surplus property available. The materiel administrator under the authority of the Director of Administrative Services shall have complete control and all powers necessary to assure efficient utilization of state property.

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 38;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 27;

R.S.1943, (2014), § 81-1118.01;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 35.